Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
ARTICLE 2 COUNTY AND MUNICIPAL SALES OR USE TAX
29-2-109. Contents of use tax ordinances and proposals - repeal.

The use tax ordinance, resolution, or proposal of any town, city, or county adopted pursuant to this article 2 shall be imposed only for the privilege of using or consuming in the town, city, or county any construction and building materials purchased at retail or for the privilege of storing, using, or consuming in the town, city, or county any motor and other vehicles, purchased at retail on which registration is required, or both. For the purposes of this subsection (1), the term "construction and building materials" shall not include parts or materials utilized in the fabrication, construction, assembly, or installation of passenger tramways, as defined in section 12-150-103 (5), by any ski area operator, as defined in section 33-44-103 (7), or any person fabricating, constructing, assembling, or installing a passenger tramway for a ski area operator. The ordinance, resolution, or proposal may recite that the use tax shall not apply to the storage and use of wood from salvaged trees killed or infested in Colorado by mountain pine beetles or spruce beetles as exempted from the state use tax pursuant to section 39-26-723. The ordinance, resolution, or proposal may recite that the use tax shall not apply to the storage and use of components used in the production of energy, including but not limited to alternating current electricity, from a renewable energy source, as exempted from the state use tax pursuant to section 39-26-724. The ordinance, resolution, or proposal may recite that the use tax shall not apply to the storage and use of eligible decarbonizing building materials, as exempted from the state use tax pursuant to section 39-26-731. The ordinance, resolution, or proposal shall recite that the use tax shall not apply:

To the storage, use, or consumption of any tangible personal property the sale of which is subject to a retail sales tax imposed by the town, city, or county;

To the storage, use, or consumption of any tangible personal property purchased for resale in the town, city, or county, either in its original form or as an ingredient of a manufactured or compounded product, in the regular course of a business;

To the storage, use, or consumption of tangible personal property brought into the town, city, or county by a nonresident thereof for his own storage, use, or consumption while temporarily within the town, city, or county; however, this exemption does not apply to the storage, use, or consumption of tangible personal property brought into this state by a nonresident to be used in the conduct of a business in this state;

To the storage, use, or consumption of tangible personal property by the United States government, or the state of Colorado, or its institutions, or its political subdivisions in their governmental capacities only or by religious or charitable corporations in the conduct of their regular religious or charitable functions;

To the storage, use, or consumption of tangible personal property by a person engaged in the business of manufacturing or compounding for sale, profit, or use any article, substance, or commodity, which tangible personal property enters into the processing of or becomes an ingredient or component part of the product or service which is manufactured, compounded, or furnished and the container, label, or the furnished shipping case thereof;

With respect to the use tax of a town or city, to the storage, use, or consumption of any article of tangible personal property the sale or use of which has already been subjected to a legally imposed sales or use tax of another statutory or home rule town, city, or city and county equal to or in excess of that imposed by this article. A credit shall be granted against the use tax imposed by this article with respect to a person's storage, use, or consumption in the town or city of tangible personal property purchased by him in a previous statutory or home rule town, city, or city and county. The amount of the credit shall be equal to the tax paid by him by reason of the imposition of a sales or use tax of the previous statutory or home rule town, city, or city and county on his purchase or use of the property. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax imposed by this article.

With respect to the use tax of a statutory or home rule county, to the storage, use, or consumption of any article of tangible personal property the sale or use of which has already been subjected to a legally imposed sales or use tax of another statutory or home rule county equal to or in excess of that imposed by this article. A credit shall be granted against the use tax imposed by this article with respect to a person's storage, use, or consumption in the subsequent statutory or home rule county of tangible personal property purchased by him in a previous statutory or home rule county. The amount of the credit shall be equal to the tax paid by him by reason of the imposition of a sales or use tax of the previous statutory or home rule county on his purchase or use of the property. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax imposed by this article.

To the storage, use, or consumption of tangible personal property and household effects acquired outside of the town, city, or county and brought into it by a nonresident acquiring residency;

To the storage or use of a motor vehicle if the owner is or was, at the time of purchase, a nonresident of the town, city, or county and he purchased the vehicle outside of the town, city, or county for use outside the town, city, or county and actually so used it for a substantial and primary purpose for which it was acquired and he registered, titled, and licensed said motor vehicle outside of the town, city, or county;

To the storage, use, or consumption of any construction and building materials and motor and other vehicles on which registration is required if a written contract for the purchase thereof was entered into prior to the effective date of such use tax;

To the storage, use, or consumption of any construction and building materials required or made necessary in the performance of any construction contract bid, let, or entered into at any time prior to the effective date of such use tax ordinance, resolution, or proposal.

(1.5) Repealed.

No use tax of any town shall be imposed with respect to the use or consumption of taxable tangible personal property within the town that occurs more than three years after the most recent sale of the property if, within the three years following such sale, the property has been significantly used within the state for the principal purpose for which it was purchased.

Construction equipment which is located within the boundaries of a home rule city, town, or city and county for a period of thirty consecutive days or less shall be subjected to the use tax of such home rule city, town, or city and county in an amount which does not exceed the amount calculated as follows: The purchase price of the equipment shall be multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is one and the denominator of which is twelve, and the result shall be multiplied by the use tax rate of the home rule city, town, or city and county. Where the provisions of this subsection (3) are utilized, the credit provisions of subsection (6) of this section shall apply at such time as the aggregate sales and use taxes legally imposed by and paid to other statutory and home rule cities, towns, and cities and counties on any such equipment equal the full use tax of the subsequent home rule city, town, or city and county.

In order to avail himself of the provisions of subsection (3) of this section, the taxpayer shall comply with the following procedure:

Prior to or on the date the equipment is located within the boundaries of a home rule city, town, or city and county, the taxpayer shall file with such home rule city, town, or city and county an equipment declaration on a form provided by such home rule city, town, or city and county. Such declaration shall state the dates on which the taxpayer anticipates the equipment will be located within and removed from the boundaries of the home rule city, town, or city and county, shall include a description of each such anticipated piece of equipment, shall state the actual or anticipated purchase price of each such anticipated piece of equipment, and shall include such other information as reasonably deemed necessary by the home rule city, town, or city and county.

The taxpayer shall file with the home rule city, town, or city and county an amended equipment declaration reflecting any changes in the information contained in any previous equipment declaration no less than once every ninety days after the equipment is brought into the boundaries of such home rule city, town, or city and county or, for equipment which is brought into the boundaries of a home rule city, town, or city and county for a project of less than ninety days duration, no later than ten days after substantial completion of the project.

The taxpayer need not report on any equipment declaration any equipment for which the purchase price was under two thousand five hundred dollars. If such equipment declaration is given, then as to any item of construction equipment for which the customary purchase price is under two thousand five hundred dollars which was brought into the boundaries of the home rule city, town, or city and county temporarily for use on a construction project, it shall be presumed that the item was purchased in a jurisdiction having a local sales or use tax as high as that of such home rule city, town, or city and county where the construction takes place and that such sales or use tax was previously paid. In such case the burden of proof in any proceeding before such city, town, or city and county, the executive director of the department of revenue, or the district court, shall be on such home rule, city, town, or city and county where the construction takes place to prove such local sales or use tax was not paid.

If the taxpayer fails to comply with the provisions of subsection (4) of this section, the taxpayer may not avail himself of the provisions of subsection (3) of this section. However, substantial compliance with the provisions of subsection (4) of this section shall allow the taxpayer to avail himself of the provisions of subsection (3) of this section.

No use tax of any home rule city, town, or city and county shall apply to the storage, use, or consumption of any article of tangible personal property the sale or use of which has already been subjected to a sales or use tax of another statutory or home rule city, town, or city and county legally imposed on the purchaser or user equal to or in excess of that imposed by the subsequent home rule city, town, or city and county. A credit shall be granted against the use tax of the home rule city, town, or city and county with respect to the person's storage, use, or consumption in the home rule city, town, or city and county of tangible personal property, the amount of the credit to equal the tax paid by him by reason of the imposition of a sales or use tax of the previous statutory or home rule city, town, or city and county on his purchase or use of the property. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax imposed by the subsequent home rule city, town, or city and county.

The use tax of any town, city, city and county, or county, whether home rule or statutory, shall not apply to the storage of construction and building materials.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 1479, § 5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 138-10-10.

L. 75:

Entire section R&RE, p. 963, § 6, effective July 14.

L. 85:

IP(1) and (1)(f) amended and (2), (3), and (4) added, p. 1036, § 5, effective January 1, 1986.

L. 99:

(2) amended, p. 1338, § 1, effective August 4.

L. 2000:

IP(1) amended, p. 1163, § 2, effective May 26.

L. 2008:

IP(1) amended, p. 1322, § 7, effective May 27; IP(1) amended, p. 1547, § 5, effective May 28.

L. 2009:

IP(1) amended, (HB 09-1126), ch. 254, p. 1149, § 5, effective May 15.

L. 2012:

IP(1) amended, (HB 12-1045), ch. 191, p. 766, § 3, effective May 21.

L. 2014:

(1.5) added, (HB 14-1159), ch. 229, p. 852, § 3, effective May 17.

L. 2019:

IP(1) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1717, § 208, effective October 1.

L. 2022:

IP(1) amended, (SB 22-051), ch. 333, p. 2360, § 7, effective August 10.

29-2-110. Filing with executive director - when deemed to have been made.

Any report, claim, tax return, statement, or other document required or authorized under this article to be filed with or any payment made to the executive director of the department of revenue which:

Is transmitted through the United States mails shall be deemed filed with and received by the executive director on the date shown by the cancellation mark stamped on the envelope or other wrapper containing the document required to be filed;

Is mailed but not received by the executive director, or is received and the cancellation mark is not legible or is erroneous or omitted, shall be deemed to have been filed and received on the date it was mailed if the sender establishes by competent evidence that the document was deposited in the United States mails on or before the date due for filing. In such cases of nonreceipt of a document by the executive director, the sender shall file a duplicate copy thereof within thirty days after written notification is given to the sender by the executive director of the failure to receive such document.

If any report, claim, tax return, statement, remittance, or other document is sent by United States registered mail, certified mail, or certificate of mailing, a record authenticated by the United States postal service of such registration, certification, or certificate shall be considered competent evidence that the report, claim, tax return, statement, remittance, or other document was mailed to the executive director, to the state officer or state agency to which it was addressed, and the date of the registration, certification, or certificate shall be deemed to be the postmark date.

If the date for filing any report, claim, tax return, statement, remittance, or other document falls upon a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, it shall be deemed to have been timely filed if filed on the next business day.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire section added, p. 1403, § 1, effective July 1.

29-2-111. Pledging of sales and use tax for capital improvements. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 81:

Entire section added, p. 1405, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(4) and (5) added, p. 244, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2018:

Entire section repealed, (SB 18-106), ch. 122, p. 827, § 2, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-106, see section 1 of chapter 122, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

29-2-112. Sales and use tax revenue bonds.

Subject to the approval of the registered electors of a county, city, or incorporated town pursuant to section 20 of article X of the state constitution, any county, city, or incorporated town may, in anticipation of collection of sales or use tax revenues, issue revenue bonds payable from the revenues for the purpose of financing capital improvements.

The revenue bonds may be authorized and issued by ordinance or resolution of the governing body of the county, city, or incorporated town.

The revenue bonds shall bear interest at a rate such that the net effective interest rate of the issue of bonds does not exceed the maximum net effective interest rate authorized, payable semiannually or annually, and such interest shall be evidenced by one or two sets of coupons, if any, executed with the facsimile or manually executed signature of any official of the county, city, or incorporated town; except that the first coupon appertaining to any bond may evidence interest not in excess of one year. The resolution or ordinance authorizing the issuance of such bonds shall specify the maximum net effective interest rate. Such bonds may be issued in one or more series, may bear such date, may mature at such time as determined by the governing body but in no event beyond thirty years from their respective dates, may be in such denomination, may be payable in such medium of payment, at such place within or without the state, including but not limited to the office of the county treasurer, may carry such registration privileges, may be subject to such terms of prior redemption in advance of maturity in such order or by lot or otherwise at such time with or without a premium, may be executed in such manner, may bear such privileges for reissuance in the same or other denomination, may be so reissued, without modification of maturities and interest rates, and may be in such form, either coupon or registered, as may be provided by the governing body.

The governing body may provide for preferential security for any bonds, both principal and interest, to the extent deemed feasible and desirable by such governing body over any bonds that may be issued thereafter.

The revenue bonds may be sold at, above, or below the principal amounts thereof, but they may not be sold at a price such that the net effective interest rate of the issue of bonds exceeds the maximum net effective interest rate authorized.

The revenue bonds may be sold at either public or private sale.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the governing body in any proceedings authorizing bonds under this section may:

Provide for the initial issuance of one or more bonds, referred to in this subsection (5) as a "bond", aggregating the amount of the entire issue;

Make such provision for installment payments of the principal amount of any such bond as it may consider desirable;

Provide for the making of any such bond, payable to bearer or otherwise, registrable as to principal or interest or both and, where interest accruing thereon is not represented by interest coupons, for the endorsing of payments of interest on such bond; and

Make further provision in any such proceedings for the manner and circumstances in and under which any such bond may in the future, at the request of the holder thereof, be converted into bonds of smaller denominations, which bonds of smaller denominations may in turn be either coupon bonds or bonds registrable as to principal or principal and interest, or both.

The revenue bonds and any coupons bearing the facsimile or manual signatures of officers in office on the date of the signing thereof shall be valid and binding obligations of the county, city, or incorporated town, notwithstanding that before the delivery thereof and payment therefor any or all of the persons whose signatures appear thereon have ceased to be officers of the entity issuing the same.

Any officer authorized or permitted to sign any bond or interest coupon, at the time of its execution and of the execution of a signature certificate, may adopt, as and for his or her own facsimile signature, the facsimile signature of his or her predecessor in office in the event that such facsimile signature appears upon the bond or coupons appertaining thereto, or upon both the bond and such coupons.

The clerk of the county, city, or incorporated town may cause the seal of such entity to be printed, engraved, stamped, or otherwise placed in facsimile on any bond. The facsimile seal has the same legal effect as the impression of the seal.

The revenue bonds and the income therefrom are exempt from taxation, except inheritance, estate, and transfer taxes.

The revenue bonds shall not constitute an indebtedness of the county, city, or incorporated town within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory debt limitation or provision. Each bond issue under this section shall recite in substance that said bonds, including the interest thereon, are payable solely from the sales and use tax revenues and that said bonds do not constitute a debt within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitation.

Any ordinance or resolution authorizing any bonds under this section may provide that each bond therein authorized shall recite that it is issued under authority of this section. Such recital shall conclusively impart full compliance with all of the provisions of this section, and all bonds issued containing such recital shall be incontestable for any cause whatsoever after their delivery for value.

A home rule municipality may elect to issue sales or use tax revenue bonds pursuant to this section unless a provision of the municipal charter prohibits the issuance of such bonds.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire section added, p. 1406, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(1), (2), and (9) amended, (SB 18-106), ch. 122, p. 828, § 3, effective August 8.

Cross references:

(1) For the definition of "capital improvement purposes" as it applies to this section, see § 29-2-111 (4).

(2) For the legislative declaration in SB 18-106, see section 1 of chapter 122, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

29-2-113. Sales and use tax simplification task force - repeal of section. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 1038, § 6, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (7) provided for the repeal of this section, effective January 1, 1986. (See L. 85, p. 1038.)

29-2-114. Retail marijuana excise tax - county - municipality - election - repeal.

In addition to any sales tax imposed pursuant to section 29-2-103 and articles 26 and 28.8 of title 39, and in addition to the excise tax imposed pursuant to article 28.8 of title 39, each county in the state is authorized to levy, collect, and enforce a county excise tax on the first sale or transfer of unprocessed retail marijuana by a retail marijuana cultivation facility authorized by the county at a rate of up to five percent of the average market rate, as determined by the department of revenue pursuant to section 39-28.8-101 (1), of the unprocessed retail marijuana if the transaction is between affiliated retail marijuana business licensees and at a rate of up to five percent of the contract price, as defined in section 39-28.8-101 (2.5), for unprocessed retail marijuana if the transaction is between unaffiliated retail marijuana business licensees; except that a county is not authorized to levy, collect, and enforce a county excise tax on the first sale or transfer of unprocessed retail marijuana by a retail marijuana cultivation facility pursuant to this subsection (1) within any municipality that levies such an excise tax pursuant to subsection (2) of this section and a county which, before November 1, 2018, obtained the approval of the eligible electors of the county as required by subsection (1)(b) of this section to levy only a county excise tax on the first sale or transfer of unprocessed retail marijuana by a retail marijuana cultivation facility that is calculated based upon the average market rate of unprocessed retail marijuana and in which the eligible electors thereafter rejected a proposed amendment to allow the tax to be calculated based on the contract price for transactions between unaffiliated retail marijuana businesses may continue to collect the tax on such transactions based on an average market rate calculation until December 31, 2020. The tax shall be imposed at the time when the retail marijuana cultivation facility first sells or transfers unprocessed retail marijuana from the retail marijuana cultivation facility to a retail marijuana product manufacturing facility, a retail marijuana store, or another retail marijuana cultivation facility.

No excise tax shall be levied pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) until the proposal has been referred to and approved by the eligible electors of the county. The adoption procedures for a countywide sales tax, use tax, or both, as specified in this article, shall apply to the referral and approval of an excise tax pursuant to this subsection (1). Any proposal for the levy of an excise tax in accordance with paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) may be submitted to the eligible electors of the county only on the date of the state general election or on the first Tuesday in November of an odd-numbered year, and any election on the proposal must be conducted by the county clerk and recorder in accordance with the "Uniform Election Code of 1992", articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S.

In addition to any sales tax imposed pursuant to section 29-2-102 and articles 26 and 28.8 of title 39, and in addition to the excise tax imposed pursuant to article 28.8 of title 39, each municipality in the state is authorized to levy, collect, and enforce a municipal excise tax on the first sale or transfer of unprocessed retail marijuana by a retail marijuana cultivation facility at a rate of up to five percent of the average market rate, as determined by the department of revenue pursuant to section 39-28.8-101 (1), of the unprocessed retail marijuana if the transaction is between affiliated retail marijuana business licensees and at a rate of up to five percent of the contract price, as defined in section 39-28.8-101 (2.5), for unprocessed retail marijuana if the transaction is between unaffiliated retail marijuana business licensees; except that a municipality which, before November 1, 2018, obtained the approval of the eligible electors of the municipality as required by subsection (2)(b) of this section to levy only a municipal excise tax on the first sale or transfer of unprocessed retail marijuana by a retail marijuana cultivation facility that is calculated based upon the average market rate of unprocessed retail marijuana and in which the eligible electors thereafter rejected a proposed amendment to allow the tax to be calculated based on the contract price for transactions between unaffiliated retail marijuana businesses may continue to collect the tax on such transactions based on an average market rate calculation until December 31, 2020. The tax shall be imposed at the time when the retail marijuana cultivation facility first sells or transfers unprocessed retail marijuana from the retail marijuana cultivation facility to a retail marijuana product manufacturing facility, a retail marijuana store, or another retail marijuana cultivation facility.

No excise tax shall be levied pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) until the proposal has been referred to and approved by the eligible electors of the municipality in accordance with the provisions of article 10 of title 31, C.R.S. Any proposal for the levy of an excise tax in accordance with paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) may be submitted to the eligible electors of the municipality on the date of the state general election, on the first Tuesday in November of an odd-numbered year, or on the date of a municipal biennial election. Any election on the proposal shall be conducted by the clerk of the municipality in accordance with the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965", article 10 of title 31, C.R.S.

Any excise tax imposed by a county or municipality pursuant to this section shall not be collected, administered, or enforced by the department of revenue, but shall instead be collected, administered, and enforced by the county or municipality imposing the tax.

A county or municipality in which the eligible electors have approved an excise tax pursuant to this section may credit the revenues collected from the tax to the general fund of the county or municipality or to any special fund created in the county or municipality's treasury. The governing body of a county or municipality may use the revenues collected from the tax imposed pursuant to this section for any purpose as determined by the governing body or the electors of the county or municipality, as applicable.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to invalidate the presumed legality of any county or municipal excise tax imposed on the first sale or transfer of unprocessed retail marijuana by a retail marijuana cultivation facility that is consistent with this section and that is in addition to any excise tax imposed pursuant to article 28.8 of title 39, C.R.S., and that was approved by the eligible electors of the county or municipality prior to June 4, 2015.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit counties and municipalities from cooperating to create a countywide uniform excise tax on the first sale or transfer of unprocessed retail marijuana by a retail marijuana cultivation facility with voluntary abandonment of municipal excise tax ordinances.

If a retail marijuana cultivation facility uses a retail marijuana transporter, as defined in section 44-10-103 (65), to transport unprocessed retail marijuana being sold or transferred by the retail marijuana cultivation facility to a retail marijuana product manufacturer facility, a retail marijuana store, or another retail marijuana cultivation facility, the transportation of the unprocessed retail marijuana by the retail marijuana transporter is not a transfer of unprocessed retail marijuana for the purpose of levying any excise tax imposed pursuant to this section.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire section added, (HB 15-1367), ch. 271, p. 1078, § 18, effective June 4.

L. 2017:

(1)(a) and (2)(a) amended, (SB 17-192), ch. 299, p. 1640, § 5, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(1)(a) and (2)(a) amended and (7) and (8) added, (SB 18-259), ch. 406, p. 2388, § 1, effective January 1, 2019.

L. 2019:

(7) amended, (SB 19-241), ch. 390, p. 3474, § 43, effective August 2; (7) amended, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2941, § 28, effective January 1, 2020.

29-2-115. Retail marijuana sales tax - county - municipality - election - legislative declaration - definition.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that the special sales tax recognized in this section permits counties and statutory municipalities to enact an additional tax specific to the sale of retail marijuana and retail marijuana products, subject to voter approval. This distinct taxing authority is in addition to the statutory authority for counties and statutory municipalities to impose a general sales tax, while home rule municipalities derive all sales taxing authority from the home rule authority granted by the Colorado constitution.

The general assembly further finds and declares that any special sales tax on retail marijuana and retail marijuana products proposed by counties and statutory municipalities should take into account the total tax rate that would exist if the tax is adopted by voters. It is therefore also the intent of the general assembly in enacting this section to ensure that the imposition of a county special sales tax within a home rule municipality or statutory municipality occurs only when the municipality does not have its own special sales tax, and otherwise only after an intergovernmental agreement with a municipality that does impose, or imposes at any time, its own special sales tax.

For purposes of this section, "special sales tax" means a sales tax imposed by a local government in addition to the general sales tax imposed pursuant to section 29-2-102 or section 29-2-103, as applicable, and in addition to the taxes imposed pursuant to articles 26 and 28.8 of title 39.

Each county in the state is authorized to levy, collect, and enforce a county special sales tax upon all sales of retail marijuana and retail marijuana products, as those terms are defined in section 44-10-103, under the following circumstances:

A county may levy, collect, and enforce a county special sales tax upon all sales of retail marijuana and retail marijuana products pursuant to this subsection (3) in the unincorporated areas of the county;

A county may levy, collect, and enforce a county special sales tax upon all sales of retail marijuana and retail marijuana products pursuant to this subsection (3) in the municipalities within the boundaries of the county, in whole or in part, that do not levy a municipal special sales tax on the sale of retail marijuana and retail marijuana products. The county may levy a special sales tax in a municipality pursuant to this subsection (3)(a)(II) only until the municipality obtains voter approval to levy a municipal special sales tax on retail marijuana and retail marijuana products. If the municipality obtains such voter approval, the county special sales tax authorized by this subsection (3)(a)(II) is invalid within the corporate limits of the municipality unless the county enters into an intergovernmental agreement with the municipality pursuant to subsection (3)(a)(III) of this section that authorizes the county to continue to levy, collect, and enforce the special sales tax on retail marijuana and retail marijuana products within the corporate limits of the municipality.

A county may levy, collect, and enforce a county special sales tax upon all sales of retail marijuana and retail marijuana products pursuant to this subsection (3) in each municipality within the boundaries of the county, in whole or in part, that levies a municipal special sales tax on the sales of retail marijuana and retail marijuana products, if the governing body of the county and the governing body of the municipality enter into an intergovernmental agreement pertaining to the county's levy, collection, and enforcement of a county special sales tax upon all sales of all retail marijuana and retail marijuana products within the corporate limits of the municipality. An intergovernmental agreement pursuant to this subsection (3)(a)(III) may include a provision for the apportionment of a specified percentage of the gross county retail marijuana special sales tax revenue collected by the county to the municipality.

Notwithstanding section 29-2-103 (2), a county may levy, collect, and enforce a special sales tax pursuant to this subsection (3) in less than the entire county when the county satisfies one or more of the conditions of this subsection (3).

No special sales tax shall be levied pursuant to this subsection (3) until the proposal has been referred to and approved by the eligible electors of the county in accordance with this article 2. Any proposal for the levy of a special sales tax in accordance with this subsection (3) may be submitted to the eligible electors of the county only on the date of the state general election or on the first Tuesday in November of an odd-numbered year. Any election on the proposal must be conducted by the county clerk and recorder in accordance with the "Uniform Election Code of 1992", articles 1 to 13 of title 1.

Each municipality in the state is authorized to levy, collect, and enforce a municipal special sales tax upon all sales of retail marijuana and retail marijuana products, as those terms are defined in section 44-10-103.

No special sales tax shall be levied pursuant to subsection (4)(a) of this section until the proposal has been referred to and approved by the eligible electors of the municipality in accordance with article 10 of title 31. Any proposal for the levy of a special sales tax in accordance with subsection (4)(a) of this section must be submitted to the eligible electors of the municipality on the date of the state general election, on the first Tuesday in November of an odd-numbered year, or on the date of a municipal biennial election. Any election on the proposal must be conducted by the clerk of the municipality in accordance with the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965", article 10 of title 31.

If a county or municipality obtained approval from the eligible electors of the county or municipality prior to May 4, 2017, to levy, collect, and enforce a special sales tax on the sale of retail marijuana and retail marijuana products, the special sales tax is valid and the county or municipality is authorized to continue to levy, collect, and enforce the special sales tax; except that, in the case of a county, the county is authorized to continue to levy, collect, and enforce the special sales tax so long as the county complies with subsection (3) of this section. If a county levies, collects, and enforces a special sales tax in a municipality that has already obtained voter approval to levy a municipal special sales tax on the sale of retail marijuana and retail marijuana products, the county special sales tax is invalid within the corporate limits of the municipality unless the county enters into an intergovernmental agreement with the municipality pursuant to subsection (3)(a)(III) of this section that authorizes the county to continue to levy, collect, and enforce the special sales tax on retail marijuana and retail marijuana products within the corporate limits of the municipality.

Notwithstanding this article 2, any retail marijuana special sales tax imposed by a county or municipality pursuant to this section shall not be collected, administered, or enforced by the department of revenue, but shall instead be collected, administered, and enforced by the county or municipality imposing the special sales tax.

A county or municipality in which a special sales tax is imposed pursuant to this section may authorize a retail marijuana store to retain a percentage of the retail marijuana special sales tax collected pursuant to this section to cover the expenses of collecting and remitting the special sales tax to the county or municipality. The county or municipality shall determine the percentage that a retail marijuana store may retain pursuant to this subsection (6)(b).

A county or municipality in which the eligible electors have approved a special sales tax pursuant to this section may credit the revenues collected from the special sales tax to the general fund of the county or municipality or to any special fund created in the county or municipality's treasury. The governing body of a county or municipality may use the revenues collected from the special sales tax imposed pursuant to this section for any purpose as determined by the governing body of the county or the municipality.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (HB 17-1203), ch. 196, p. 714, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 2019:

IP(3)(a) and (4)(a) amended, (SB 19-241), ch. 390, p. 3474, § 44, effective August 2; IP(3)(a) and (4)(a) amended, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2942, § 29, effective January 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

Subsections IP(3)(a) and (4)(a) were amended in SB 19-241. Those amendments were superseded by the amendment of subsections IP(3)(a) and (4)(a) in SB 19-224, effective January 1, 2020.